Utah statutes.
16-6a-1603.   Scope of inspection right.
(1)  A director's or member's agent or attorney has the same inspection and
copying rights as the director or member.
(2)  The right to copy records under Section 16-6a-1602 includes, if
reasonable, the right to receive copies made by photographic, xerographic,
electronic, or other means.
(3)  Except as provided in Section 16-6a-1606, the nonprofit corporation may
impose a reasonable charge covering the costs of labor and material for copies
of any documents provided to the director or member.  The charge may not
exceed the estimated cost of production and reproduction of the records.
(4)  The nonprofit corporation may comply with a director's or member's demand
to inspect the record of members under Subsection 16-6a-1601(3) by furnishing
to the director or member a list of directors or members that:
(a)  complies with Subsection 16-6a-1601(3); and
(b)  is compiled no earlier than the date of the director's or member's
demand.
